District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34j

District officials.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 2-1217.34i(c), the elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the Bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the Bonds, or for any representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this subpart [§§ 2-1217.34a to 2-1217.34n], the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

(b)

The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of any official appearing on the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory ceases to hold that office before delivery of the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 11, 57 DCR 9873
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 11 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 11 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).